New York, session 2025-2026, A11382.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 702 of the correction law, as 2 amended by chapter 488 of the laws of 2011, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. Any court of this state [may, in its discretion,] shall issue a 5 certificate of relief from disabilities to an eligible offender for a 6 conviction that occurred in such court, if the court either (a) imposed 7 a revocable sentence or (b) imposed a sentence other than one executed 8 by commitment to an institution under the jurisdiction of the state 9 department of corrections and community supervision, and determines that 10 the requirements of subdivision two of this section have been satisfied. 11 Such certificate [may] shall be issued [(i)] at the time sentence is 12 pronounced, in which case it may grant relief from forfeitures, as well 13 as from disabilities, [or (ii)] provided, however, that if the court has 14 not determined a certificate of relief from all disabilities is 15 warranted at the time sentence is pronounced, a certificate of relief 16 from disabilities shall be issued at any time thereafter the court 17 determines the requirements of this section have been satisfied, in 18 which case it shall apply only to disabilities. Where such court either 19 imposes a revocable sentence or imposes a sentence other than one 20 executed by commitment to an institution under the jurisdiction of the 21 state department of corrections and community supervision, the court, 22 upon application and in accordance with subdivision two of this section, 23 shall initially determine the fitness of an eligible offender for such 24 certificate prior to or at the time sentence is pronounced. 25 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 26 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14940-02-6